Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.7 Grants to Disaster Victims

30-15.7-1.
Federal funds.

Whenever the governor has declared a disaster emergency to exist under the laws of this state, or the president of the United States, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this state, the governor is authorized:

Upon determination by the governor that financial assistance is essential to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by a major disaster that cannot be otherwise adequately met from other means of assistance, to accept a grant by the federal government to fund financial assistance, subject to such terms and conditions as may be imposed upon the grant; and

To enter into an agreement with the federal government, or any officer or agency thereof, pledging the state to participate in the funding of the financial assistance authorized in subsection (a) of this section, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) thereof, and, if state funds are not otherwise available to the governor, to accept an advance of the state share from the federal government to be repaid when the state is able to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 162, § 1.

30-15.7-2.
State grants.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the governor is authorized to make financial grants to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by a major disaster which cannot otherwise adequately be met from other means of assistance, which shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate, to an individual or family in any single major disaster declared by the president of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 162, § 1.

30-15.7-3.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall, from time to time, appropriate sufficient sums out of the general treasury not otherwise appropriated to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 162, § 1.

30-15.7-4.
Regulations.

The governor shall make such regulations as are necessary for the carrying out of this chapter, including, but not limited to:

Standards of eligibility for persons applying for benefits;

Procedures for applying and administration;

Methods of investigation, filing, and approving applications; and

Formation of local or statewide boards to pass upon applications and procedures for appeals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 162, § 1.

30-15.7-5.
Penalty.

Any person who fraudulently or willfully makes a misstatement of fact in connection with an application for financial assistance under this chapter shall, upon conviction of each offense, be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 162, § 1.